Illinois, session 104th, HB537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Short Term Borrowing Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 340/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 406)7    Sec. 1. Cash flow borrowing. Whenever significant timing 8variations occur between disbursement and and receipt of 9budgeted funds within a fiscal year, making it necessary to 10borrow in anticipation of revenues to be collected in a fiscal 11year, in order to meet the same, the Governor, Comptroller and 12Treasurer may contract debts, in an amount not exceeding 5% of 13the State's appropriations for that fiscal year, and moneys 14thus borrowed shall be applied to the purpose for which they 15were obtained, or to pay the costs of borrowing and the debts 16thus created, and to no other purpose. All moneys so borrowed 17shall be repaid by the close of the fiscal year in which 18borrowed.19(Source: P.A. 101-630, eff. 5-29-20.)